Washington statutes.
RCW 35.59.050

Powers of condemnation.

The accomplishment of the objectives authorized by this chapter is declared to be a strictly public purpose of the municipality or municipalities authorized to perform the same. Any such municipality shall have the power to acquire by condemnation and purchase any lands and property rights within its boundaries which are necessary to carry out the purposes authorized by this chapter. Such right of eminent domain shall be exercised by the legislative body of each such municipality in the manner provided by applicable general law.

[ 1967 c 110 s 5.]